Utah statutes.
35A-3-203.   Functions and duties of office -- Annual report.

The office shall:

(1)  assess critical child care needs throughout the state on an ongoing basis and focus its activities on helping to meet the most critical needs;

(2)  provide child care subsidy services for income-eligible children through age 12 and for income-eligible children with disabilities through age 18;

(3)  provide information:

(a)  to employers for the development of options for child care in the work place; and

(b)  for educating the public in obtaining quality child care;

(4)  coordinate services for quality child care training and child care resource and referral core services;

(5)  apply for, accept, or expend gifts or donations from public or private sources;

(6)  provide administrative support services to the committee;

(7)  work collaboratively with the following for the delivery of quality child care and early childhood programs, and school age programs throughout the state:

(a)  the State Board of Education; and

(b)  the Department of Health;

(8)  research child care programs and public policy that will improve quality and accessibility and that will further the purposes of the office and child care, early childhood programs, and school age programs;

(9)  provide planning and technical assistance for the development and implementation of programs in communities that lack child care, early childhood programs, and school age programs;

(10)  provide organizational support for the establishment of nonprofit organizations approved by the Child Care Advisory Committee, created in Section 35A-3-205; and

(11) submit an annual written report to the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee before November 1 on the status of child care in Utah.

